South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3846.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-23-37.  (A) An owner of a boat that is anchored in the waters of this State more than thirty days must maintain a liability insurance policy on the boat with one hundred-thousand-dollars minimum coverage. To obtain the policy, the boat owner must provide the insurer a recent vessel survey that includes a declaration that the boat is seaworthy and that the boat can move under its own power as intended when built. Sailboats must have working sails and powerboats must have a working motor. The survey must have been completed within six months of the policy being issued and completed by a licensed boat surveyor. All policy premiums must be current before a policy can be renewed and new stickers sent to the boat owner. The insurer shall issue two 3Â½ x 3Â½-inch watercraft stickers to the boat owner each time a policy is issued or renewed. The stickers must have the year in one-inch font and the insurance company, policy number, and boat registration number on the sticker and be attached to the anchored boat. The insurer shall require a new survey from the boat owner after each three-year period before renewing the policy on year four. (B) An owner of a nonmotorized floating structure that is anchored in the waters of this State or attached to a boat anchored in this State for more than thirty days must maintain a liability insurance policy on the structure with one hundred-thousand-dollars minimum coverage. To obtain the policy, the structure owner must provide the insurer a recent vessel survey that includes a declaration that the structure is seaworthy. All policy premiums must be current before a policy can be renewed and new stickers sent to the structure owner. The insurer shall issue two 3Â½ x 3Â½-inch watercraft stickers to the structure owner each time a policy is issued or renewed. The stickers must have the year in one-inch font and the insurance company, policy number, and structure registration number on the sticker and be attached to the structure. The insurer shall require a new survey from the structure owner after each three-year period before renewing the policy on year four. (C) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be imprisoned not more than thirty days and fined not more than five hundred dollars. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----